Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB228.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 600 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A child incarcerated pursuant to the statewide detention program established in KRS
15A.305 shall have the right to:
(1) Be kept safe, informed, and free from emotional, psychological, verbal, and
physical abuse;
(2) Speak with, see, and touch their family;
(3) Access appropriate medical, mental health, and behavioral health care;
(4) An education meeting their individual needs;
(5) A nutritious and healthy diet;
(6) Be treated with respect and recognition of their dignity and individuality;
(7) Be free from unreasonable use of seclusion and restraint;
(8) Receive notice of and participate in court hearings;
(9) Access counsel; and
(10) Be free from judgment, blame, or stigma associated with detention.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Incarcerated Children's Bill of Rights.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 9/10/2024 9:42 AM Jacketed